Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 323.800 is amended to read:
323.800. As used in ORS 323.800 to 323.806:
(1) “Adjusted for inflation” means increased in accordance  with the formula for inflation ad-
justment set forth in Exhibit C to the Master Settlement Agreement.
(2)(a) “Affiliate” means a person  who directly or indirectly owns or controls, is owned or con-
trolled by, or is under common ownership or control with, another person.
(b) For purposes of defining “affiliate”:
(A) The terms “owns,” “is owned” and “ownership” mean  ownership of an equity interest, or the
equivalent thereof, of 10 percent or more; and
(B) The term “person” means an individual,  partnership, committee, association, corporation or
any other organization or group of persons.
(3) “Allocable share” means Allocable Share as that term is defined in the  Master Settlement
Agreement.
(4)(a) “Cigarette” means any product that contains nicotine, is intended to be burned or heated
under ordinary conditions of use, and consists of or contains:
(A) Any roll of tobacco wrapped in paper or in any substance not containing tobacco;
(B) Tobacco, in any form, that  is functional in the product and that because of its appearance,
the type of tobacco used in the  filler, or its packaging and labeling, is likely to be offered to, or
purchased by, consumers as a cigarette; or
(C) Any roll of tobacco wrapped in any  substance containing tobacco that, because of its ap-
pearance, the type of tobacco  used in the filler, or its packaging and labeling, is likely to be offered
to, or purchased by, consumers as a cigarette described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.
(b) The term “cigarette”  includes “roll-your-own tobacco” (i.e., tobacco that, because of its ap-
pearance, type, packaging or labeling, is suitable for use  and likely to be offered to, or purchased
by, consumers as tobacco for making cigarettes). For purposes of this paragraph, 0.09 ounces  of
roll-your-own tobacco shall constitute one individual cigarette.
(5) “Importer” means:
Enrolled Senate Bill 185 (SB 185-A) Page 1
(a) Any person in the United States to whom cigarettes are shipped or consigned, if  federal ex-
cise tax has not been paid on the cigarettes, and if the  cigarettes are manufactured in a foreign
country;
(b) Any person who removes cigarettes for sale or consumption in  the United States from a
customs bonded manufacturing warehouse; or
(c) Any person who smuggles or otherwise unlawfully brings cigarettes into the United States.
(6) “Master Settlement Agreement” means the settlement agreement (and related documents)
entered into on November 23, 1998,  by the State of Oregon and leading United States tobacco
product manufacturers.
(7) “Qualified escrow agreement” means the escrow agreement  described in ORS 180.415.
[(7)] (8) “Qualified escrow fund” means an escrow arrangement  with a federally or state char-
tered financial institution having  no affiliation with any tobacco product manufacturer and having
assets of at least $1 billion where such arrangement requires that such  financial institution hold the
escrowed funds’ principal for the benefit of releasing parties and prohibits the  tobacco product
manufacturer who is placing the funds into  escrow from using, accessing or directing the use of the
escrowed funds’ principal except as consistent with ORS 323.806 (1)(b)(B).
[(8)] (9) “Released claims” means Released Claims  as that term is defined in the Master Settle-
ment Agreement.
[(9)] (10) “Releasing parties” means Releasing Parties as that term is defined in  the Master
Settlement Agreement.
[(10)(a)] (11)(a) “Tobacco product manufacturer” means an entity that, after October 23,  1999,
directly (and not exclusively through any affiliate):
(A) Manufactures cigarettes anywhere that such manufacturer intends to  be sold in the United
States, including cigarettes intended to be sold in the United States through  an importer (except
where such importer is an  Original Participating Manufacturer (as that term is defined in the
Master Settlement Agreement)  that will be responsible for the payments under the Master Settle-
ment Agreement with respect to such cigarettes as a result  of the provisions of subsection II(mm)
of the Master Settlement Agreement and that pays the taxes specified in subsection II(z) of the
Master Settlement Agreement, and provided that the manufacturer of such cigarettes  does not
market or advertise such cigarettes in the United States);
(B) Is the first purchaser anywhere for resale  in the United States of cigarettes manufactured
anywhere that the manufacturer does not intend to be sold in the United States; or
(C) Becomes a successor of an entity described in subparagraph (A) or (B) of this paragraph.
(b) The term “tobacco product manufacturer” does not include an affiliate of a  tobacco product
manufacturer unless such affiliate  is itself a tobacco product manufacturer under paragraph (a)(A),
(B) or (C) of this subsection.
[(11)(a)] (12)(a) “Units sold” means the number of individual cigarettes sold in the  State of
Oregon by the applicable tobacco product  manufacturer (whether directly or through a distributor,
retailer or similar intermediary or intermediaries) during the year in question  that are required to
bear the excise tax stamp of this state or that are sold as “roll-your-own  tobacco” on which excise
tax is  due. The Department of Revenue and the Attorney General may promulgate such rules as are
necessary to ascertain the number of units sold  of such tobacco product manufacturer for each year.
(b) “Units sold” does not include cigarettes neither the  purchase nor the use of which the state
may tax under the Constitution or statutes of the United States.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 180.405 is amended to read:
180.405. As used in ORS 180.400 to 180.455 and 323.106:
(1) “Brand family” means  all styles of cigarettes sold under the same trademark and differen-
tiated from one another by means of additional modifiers or  descriptors, including, but not limited
to, cigarettes labeled “menthol,” “lights,” “kings,” “100s” and any cigarettes sold  under a brand
name, alone or in conjunction with any other word, trademark, logo, symbol, motto, selling  message,
recognizable pattern of colors or other indicia of product  identification, that are identical to, similar
to or identifiable with a previously known brand of cigarettes.
Enrolled Senate Bill 185 (SB 185-A) Page 2
(2) “Cigarette” has the meaning given that term in ORS 323.800.
(3) “Distributor” means a person  who is licensed under ORS 323.105 or 323.530 and any other
person who is a distributor for the purposes of ORS 323.005 to 323.482  or 323.500 to 323.645 .
(4) “Importer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 323.800.
(5) “Master Settlement Agreement” has the meaning given that term in ORS 323.800.
(6) “Nonparticipating manufacturer” means any tobacco product manufacturer  that is not a
participating manufacturer.
(7) “Participating manufacturer” has the meaning given that  term in section II(jj) of the Master
Settlement Agreement.
(8) “Qualified escrow fund” has the meaning given that term in ORS 323.800.
(9) “Retailer” means a person that sells cigarettes or smokeless  tobacco products to individuals
for personal consumption.
(10) “Smokeless tobacco products” has the meaning given that term in ORS 323.810.
(11) “Tobacco product manufacturer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 323.800.
(12) “Units sold” has the meaning given that term in ORS 323.800.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 180.440 is amended to read:
180.440. (1) A person may not:
(a) Affix a stamp to a package or other  container of cigarettes of a tobacco product manufac-
turer or brand family that is not included in the directory developed under ORS 180.425;
(b) Sell, offer for sale or possess for sale  cigarettes of a tobacco product manufacturer or brand
family that the person acquired at a time when the tobacco product manufacturer or  brand family
was not included in the directory developed under ORS 180.425; or
(c) Possess in this state for sale in another jurisdiction cigarettes of a tobacco  product man-
ufacturer  or  brand family that the person acquired at a time when the tobacco product manufacturer
or brand family was  not included in the directory developed under ORS 180.425 and was not in
compliance with the Master Settlement Agreement qualifying  statute in the other jurisdiction or
with statutes that supplement the qualifying statute in that jurisdiction.
(2) A person who sells, offers for sale, distributes,  acquires, holds, owns, possesses, transports,
imports or causes to be imported cigarettes that the person knows or should  know are intended for
sale or distribution in violation of subsection (1) of this section commits a Class A misdemeanor.
(3) A distributor may not affix a stamp to  a package or other container of cigarettes or
purchase untaxed roll-your-own tobacco unless the  distributor certifies to the Attorney
General, in a manner prescribed by the Attorney General,  that the distributor has purchased
the cigarettes or roll-your-own tobacco directly from the tobacco product manufacturer  or
from the first importer of the cigarettes or roll-your-own tobacco into the United States.
SECTION 4.
Section 5 of this 2019 Act is added to and made a part  of ORS 323.800 to
323.806.
SECTION 5. (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of  ORS 323.806 (2)(b), a tobacco product
manufacturer that elects to place funds into a qualified escrow fund pursuant  to ORS 323.806
(1)(b) may  assign to the state the tobacco product manufacturer’s interest in any funds in
the qualified escrow fund.
(2) An  assignment executed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section is permanent and
irrevocable and applies to all moneys in the qualified escrow fund established for  the benefit
of the  state, including all moneys deposited into the qualified escrow fund before the tobacco
product manufacturer executes the assignment, all  moneys deposited into the qualified
escrow fund  after the tobacco product manufacturer executes the assignment and any in-
terest or other appreciation earned on any moneys in the qualified escrow fund.
(3) The parties to a qualified escrow agreement may  amend the agreement for the pur-
poses of executing an assignment pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.
(4) An assignment executed pursuant to subsection (1) of this  section must be in writing
and be signed by the assignee and the assignor or by an authorized  agent or representative
thereof. An assignment that is duly executed becomes enforceable after  a copy of the as-
Enrolled Senate Bill 185 (SB 185-A) Page 3
signment is delivered to the Attorney General and the  financial institution where the quali-
fied escrow fund is maintained.
(5) Notwithstanding the provisions of ORS 323.806 (1)(b), funds assigned to the state shall
be deposited in the Tobacco Settlement Funds Account established pursuant to ORS 293.537.
(6) Nothing in this section operates to:
(a) Waive the right  of the state to bring a claim against a tobacco product manufacturer
as described in ORS 323.806 (2)(b), except  that any funds assigned to the state under this
section shall be  credited on a dollar-for-dollar basis against any judgment or settlement de-
scribed in ORS 323.806 (2)(b); or
(b) Relieve a tobacco product manufacturer from any obligation or duty imposed pursu-
ant to ORS 180.400 to 180.455 or 323.800 to 323.806.
(7) The Attorney General may adopt rules necessary to implement this section.
(8) A financial institution in which a qualified escrow fund is maintained may file a  peti-
tion in circuit court for an order authorizing a transfer of funds in the qualified escrow fund
to the state. The petition must state the factual and legal bases for the relief sought. The
financial institution shall serve the petition on the Attorney General at the time the petition
is filed. The court may order the  transfer of funds in the fund to the Tobacco Settlement
Funds Account pursuant to this section.
SECTION 6.
This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate January 31, 2019
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House May 22, 2019
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 185 (SB 185-A) Page 4